Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.172

Registration at age sixteen and seventeen—Application by mail.

(1) A person who has attained sixteen years of age may sign up to register to vote, as part of the future voter program, by submitting a voter registration application by mail.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register by mail, the person must provide a signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote in a special or general election until his or her eighteenth birthday.

[ 2020 c 208 s 16; 2018 c 109 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 3, 5, 6, and 13-17: See note following RCW 29A.08.210.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.